Ohio, session 136, HB65.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Ohio:
S 1. That sections 5.2322, 5.2411, 5.2412, 5.2413, 5.2414, 5.2415, and 5.268 of the
ECTION
Revised Code be enacted to read as follows:
Sec. 5.2322. The first week of October is designated as "Ohio Stormwater Awareness
Week."
Sec. 5.2411. The week beginning on the Saturday before the last Saturday of February
through the last Saturday in February is designated as "FFA Week."
Sec. 5.2412. The twelfth day of October is designated as "Farmer's Day."
Sec. 5.2413. The week ending with the second Saturday of March is designated as "4-H
Week."
Sec. 5.2414. The twenty-first day of March is designated as "Agriculture Day."
Sec. 5.2415. The first full week of August is designated as "National Farmers Market
Week."
Sec. 5.268. The second full week of November is designated "Ohio Soil Health Week," to
celebrate and raise awareness for the importance of soil health to Ohio agriculture and in honor of
the birthday of soil pioneer and advocate David Brandt.
S 2. This act shall be known as the Agriculture Appreciation Act.
ECTION

Am. H. B. No. 65 136th G.A.
Speaker ___________________ of the House of Representatives.
President ___________________ of the Senate.
Passed ________________________, 20____
Approved ________________________, 20____
Governor.

Am. H. B. No. 65 136th G.A.
The section numbering of law of a general and permanent nature is
complete and in conformity with the Revised Code.
Director, Legislative Service Commission.
Filed in the office of the Secretary of State at Columbus, Ohio, on the ____
day of ___________, A. D. 20____.
Secretary of State.
File No. _________ Effective Date ___________________